zh-CN: 适用 BB 弹尺寸: 4.5 毫米; 6 毫米; 8 毫米; 其他
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost zračne pištole: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Drugo
ko: 호환 BB 크기: 4.5mm; 6mm; 8mm; 기타
th: ขนาดลูกกระสุน BB ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: 4.5 มม.; 6 มม.; 8 มม.; อื่นๆ
pl: Zgodny rodzaj BB: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Inny
vi: Kích thước trục giữa tương thích: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Khác
hu: Kompatibilis BB méret: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Egyéb
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio BB: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť BB guličiek: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Iné
ja: 対応BBサイズ: 4.5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; その他
cs: Kompatibilní velikost BB: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Ostatní
ru: Совместимый калибр BB: 4,5 мм; 6 мм; 8 мм; Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina BB-a: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на сачмите: 4.5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Друго
nl: Compatibele BB-maat: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Overige
tr: Uyumlu BB boyutu: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Diğer
pt-PT: Tamanho de BB compatível: 4.5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Outro
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος BB: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Άλλο
zh-TW: 相容 BB 彈尺寸: 4.5 公釐; 6 公釐; 8 公釐; 其他
da: Kompatibel BB-størrelse: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Andet
it: Taglia BB compatibile: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Altro
es: Tamaño BB compatible: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Otro
en: Compatible BB size: 4.5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Other
fr: Taille de boîtier compatible: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Autre
pt-BR: Tamanho compatível do suporte do pedivela: 4.5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Outro
nb: Kompatibel kulestørrelse: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Annet
de: Passende Patronengröße: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Sonstige
sv: Kompatibel BB-storlek: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Övrigt
ro-RO: Dimensiune BB compatibilă: 4.5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Altele
fi: Yhteensopiva airsoft-kuulan koko: 4,5 mm; 6 mm; 8 mm; Muu